Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1505
Acquisition; disapproval; grounds.

The Director of Banking and Finance may disapprove any proposed acquisition if:

(1) The financial condition of any acquiring person is such as might jeopardize the financial stability of the bank or trust company or prejudice the interests of the depositors of the bank or trust company;

(2) The competence, experience, or integrity of any acquiring person or of any of the proposed management personnel indicates that it would not be in the interest of the depositors of the bank or trust company or in the interest of the public to permit such person to control the bank or trust company; or

(3) Any acquiring person neglects, fails, or refuses to furnish the Director of Banking and Finance all the information required by him or her.

Laws 1983, LB 240, § 5;

Laws 1995, LB 599, § 8;

Laws 2003, LB 131, § 14.